Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 27

Employee Suggestion Award and Incentive Plans

4-27-101. Establishment.

There is established an employee suggestion award program for employees and retired employees of state government.

Under this program, cash or honorary awards may be made to state employees and retired state employees whose adopted suggestions will result in substantial savings or improvement in state operations.

Acts 1977, ch. 212, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2701; Acts 1980, ch. 643, § 1.

4-27-102. Board — Establishment — Composition.

There is hereby established an employee suggestion award board, which shall be composed of the commissioner of finance and administration, the commissioner of human resources, the commissioner of general services, the executive director of fiscal review committee, and one (1) member appointed by the Tennessee State Employees Association.

Acts 1977, ch. 212, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-2702; Acts 1985, ch. 292, § 1; 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The employee suggestion award board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-27-103. Duties of board.

It is the duty of the board to:

Adopt rules governing its proceedings;

Elect a chair and secretary;

Keep permanent and accurate records of its proceedings;

Establish criteria for making awards;

Adopt rules and regulations to carry out this chapter;

Approve each award made; and

Meet at least quarterly to evaluate suggestions made by employees.

Acts 1977, ch. 212, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2703; Acts 2018, ch. 1038, § 2.

4-27-104. Ineligible employees.

In establishing criteria for making awards, the board may exclude certain levels of positions from participation in the program, but in no event shall the following levels of management be eligible to receive cash awards under the program:

LEVEL I: Governor's staff, department commissioner or equivalent;

LEVEL II: Assistant or deputy commissioner, assistant to commissioner, major fiscal and administrative policy departmental staff or equivalent;

LEVEL III: Director or division chief, including the full line division chief to a statewide program; includes chief of division supervising several line service units or equivalent;

LEVEL IV: Assistant to director or division chief, section chief or head of major departmental function or equivalent.

Acts 1977, ch. 212, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2704.

4-27-105. Cash awards — Maximum.

The cash award shall be:

Equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the annual savings realized in a fiscal year, with a maximum award of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

Paid within ninety (90) days of the end of each fiscal year in which the savings have been realized; and

Limited to the first fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the suggestion was made.

If the cash award is over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) the award must be spread over three (3) years following the fiscal year in which the suggestion was made in equal amounts; however, if the employee who is entitled to the award leaves state service the employee forfeits the remaining award appropriation item or items of the state agency to which actual savings apply.

The board shall promulgate rules to develop criteria for making awards pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, the development and implementation of an electronic mail notification to transmit to all state government employees information on the employee suggestion award program. The electronic mail notification shall be made annually by the board and shall include, but not be limited to, the provisions of this section.

In promulgating rules, the board shall consider the following factors:

Severity of the present problem;

Effectiveness of the suggestion offered;

The need to encourage improvement in state operations; and

Ingenuity of the suggestion.

Acts 1977, ch. 212, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-2705; Acts 1981, ch. 363, § 1; 1985, ch. 292, § 2; 1987, ch. 325, § 3; 2004, ch. 421, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 1038, § 1.